fr: Fonction antivol: Fixations cachées; Support de verrouillage; Bouchons à vis de verrouillage; Aucune; Câble/sangle de sécurité; Vis inviolables; Autre
zh-CN: 防盗功能: 隐藏式紧固件; 锁定支架; 防盗螺帽; 无; 防盗缆绳/绑带; 防拆螺钉; 其他
vi: Tính năng chống trộm: Chốt ẩn; Giá đỡ có khóa; Nắp bịt ốc vít có khóa; Không có; Dây cáp/đai bảo vệ; Ốc vít chống tháo trộm; Khác
pt-PT: Funcionalidade antirroubo: Fixadores ocultos; Suporte de bloqueio; Tampas de parafusos de bloqueio; Nenhum; Cabo/correia de segurança; Parafusos invioláveis; Outro
ko: 도난 방지 기능: 숨김형 패스너; 잠금 브래킷; 잠금 나사 캡; 없음; 보안 케이블/스트랩; 변조 방지 나사; 기타
ja: 盗難防止機能: 隠しファスナー; ロッキングブラケット; ロッキングスクリューキャップ; なし; セキュリティケーブル/ストラップ; いじり止めネジ; その他
tr: Hırsızlığa karşı koruma özelliği: Gizli bağlantı elemanları; Kilitleme braketi; Kilitleme vidalı kapaklar; Yok; Güvenlik kablosu/kayışı; Kurcalamaya dayanıklı vidalar; Diğer
lt-LT: Apsaugos nuo vagystės funkcija: Paslėptos tvirtinimo detalės; Fiksuojamasis laikiklis; Fiksuojamieji varžtų dangteliai; Nėra; Apsauginis trosas / dirželis; Apsauginiai varžtai; Kita
ro-RO: Funcție antifurt: Elemente de fixare ascunse; Suport de blocare; Capace de șuruburi cu blocare; Fără; Cablu/curea de securitate; Șuruburi rezistente la manipulare; Altele
pl: Funkcja antykradzieżowa: Ukryte mocowania; Wspornik blokujący; Nakładki blokujące na śruby; Brak; Kabel / pasek zabezpieczający; Śruby odporne na manipulacje; Inne
cs: Funkce proti krádeži: Skryté spojovací prvky; Uzamykací držák; Uzamykatelné krytky šroubů; Žádná; Bezpečnostní lanko/popruh; Šrouby odolné proti neoprávněné manipulaci; Jiná
el: Λειτουργία κατά της κλοπής: Κρυφοί συνδετήρες; Βραχίονας ασφάλισης; Καπάκια βιδών ασφάλισης; Κανένα; Καλώδιο/ιμάντας ασφαλείας; Βίδες ασφαλείας κατά της παραβίασης; Άλλο
it: Antifurto: Fissaggi nascosti; Staffa di bloccaggio; Tappi a vite di bloccaggio; Nessuno; Cavo/cinghia di sicurezza; Viti antimanomissione; Altro
bg-BG: Функция против кражба: Скрити крепежни елементи; Заключваща скоба; Капачки за заключващи винтове; Няма; Осигурителен кабел/ремък; Винтове със защита от подправяне; Друго
hu: Lopásgátló funkció: Rejtett kötőelemek; Zárható konzol; Zárható csavarkupakok; Nincs; Biztonsági kábel/pánt; Szabotázsbiztos csavarok; Egyéb
de: Diebstahlschutzfunktion: Verdeckte Befestigungselemente; Verriegelungshalterung; Sicherungs-Schraubkappen; Keine; Sicherheitskabel/-gurt; Manipulationssichere Schrauben; Sonstige
da: Tyverisikringsfunktion: Skjulte beslag; Låsebeslag; Låseskruelåg; Ingen; Sikkerhedskabel/-rem; Manipulationssikre skruer; Andet
th: คุณสมบัติป้องกันการโจรกรรม: ตัวยึดแบบซ่อน; ขายึดแบบล็อก; ฝาครอบสกรูแบบล็อก; ไม่มี; สายเคเบิล/สายรัดนิรภัย; สกรูป้องกันการงัดแงะ; อื่นๆ
sv: Stöldskyddsfunktion: Dolda fästelement; Låsfäste; Låsbara skruvlås; Ingen; Säkerhetskabel/-rem; Manipuleringssäkra skruvar; Annan
fi: Varkaudenestotoiminto: Piilotetut kiinnikkeet; Lukittava teline; Lukittavat ruuvinhatut; Ei mitään; Turvakaapeli/-hihna; Peukaloinnin estävät ruuvit; Muu
sl-SI: Funkcija proti kraji: Skriti pritrdilni elementi; Zaklepni nosilec; Zaklepni pokrovčki vijakov; Brez; Varnostni kabel/trak; Vijaki, varni pred nedovoljenim poseganjem; Drugo
ru: Функция защиты от кражи: Скрытые крепежи; Запорный кронштейн; Фиксирующие заглушки для винтов; Нет; Страховочный трос/ремешок; Антивандальные винты; Другое
hr-HR: Značajka zaštite od krađe: Skriveni pričvršćivači; Nosač za zaključavanje; Kape vijaka za zaključavanje; Nema; Sigurnosni kabel/remen; Vijci otporni na manipulaciju; Ostalo
es: Función antirrobo: Sujetadores ocultos; Soporte de bloqueo; Tapas de tornillos de bloqueo; Ninguno; Cable/correa de seguridad; Tornillos resistentes a manipulaciones; Otro
pt-BR: Recurso antirroubo: Fixadores ocultos; Suporte com trava; Tampas de parafuso com trava; Nenhum; Cabo/alça de segurança; Parafusos invioláveis; Outro
en: Anti-theft feature: Hidden fasteners; Locking bracket; Locking screw caps; None; Security cable/strap; Tamper-resistant screws; Other
nb: Tyverisikringsfunksjon: Skjulte fester; Låsebrakett; Låseskruelokk; Ingen; Sikkerhetskabel/-stropp; Sabotasjesikre skruer; Annet
sk-SK: Funkcia ochrany proti krádeži: Skryté upevňovacie prvky; Uzamykateľný držiak; Uzamykateľné krytky skrutiek; Žiadna; Bezpečnostný kábel/popruh; Skrutky odolné proti neoprávnenej manipulácii; Iná
nl: Antidiefstalfunctie: Verborgen sluitingen; Vergrendelingsbeugel; Vergrendelbare schroefdoppen; Geen; Veiligheidskabel/-band; Inbraakwerende schroeven; Overig
zh-TW: 防盜功能: 隱藏式緊固件; 鎖定支架; 鎖定螺絲蓋; 無; 安全纜線/綁帶; 防拆螺絲; 其他